Washington statutes.
RCW 35.55.170

Payment of contractor—Bonds, warrants, cash.

The city council may provide in letting the contract for an improvement, that the contractor shall accept special fund warrants or local improvement bonds against the local improvement district within which such improvement is to be made, in payment for the contract price of the work, and that the warrants or bonds may be issued to the contractor from time to time as the work progresses, or the city council may negotiate the special fund warrants or bonds against the local improvement district at not less than ninety-five cents in money for each dollar of warrants or bonds, and with the proceeds pay the contractor for the work and pay the other costs of such improvement.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.55.170. Prior: 1909 c 147 s 14; RRS s 9445.]